Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Hearing Instrument Specialists

63-17-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Apprentice licensee applicant” means any person who is registered with the council and, who is engaged in an approved licensing program and who is sponsored by a hearing instrument specialist duly licensed in this state. The apprentice licensee applicant shall meet the qualifications of § 63-17-207;

“Apprentice program” means sixty (60) classroom hours of prescribed coursework under the direct supervision of a hearing instrument specialist, with such coursework pertaining to all aspects of hearing instrument dispensing;

“Board” means the board of communication disorders and sciences created by § 63-17-104;

“Council” means the council for licensing hearing instrument specialists;

“Division” means the division of health related boards in the department of health;

“Hearing instrument” means any instrument or device designed for or represented as aiding, improving or correcting defective human hearing and any parts, attachments or accessories of such an instrument or device;

“Licensed hearing instrument specialist” means any person licensed by this part who has passed a council-approved psychometrically-sound examination for hearing instrument specialists;

“Practice of dispensing and fitting hearing instruments” includes the evaluation or measurement of the powers or range of human hearing by means of an audiometer for the consequent selection or adaptation for sale of hearing instruments intended to compensate for hearing loss, including the appropriate instructions, consultations, suggestions, recommendations or opinions related to this practice, including the making of an impression of the ear, or an ear mold; and

“Sell” or “sale” includes any transfer of title or of the right to use by lease, bailment or any other contract, either oral or written, except wholesale sales to distributors or dispensers.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 3.

63-17-202. Council for licensing hearing instrument specialists.

There is hereby created a council within the board to be known as the council for licensing hearing instrument specialists, with the duties and powers as provided in § 63-17-203.

The council shall consist of five (5) members, to be appointed by the governor. Such members shall possess the following qualifications:

Three (3) members shall be qualified hearing instrument specialists and fitters of hearing instruments who have been duly licensed as such in Tennessee, and who are certified by the National Board for Certification — Hearing Instrument Sciences. Such members may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted to the governor by interested audiology groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Hearing Aid Society. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions;

One (1) member shall be a physician who has been duly licensed to practice medicine in Tennessee, and who has received certification from the American Council of Otolaryngology. The member may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted to the governor by interested medical groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Medical Association. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine a qualified person to fill the position; and

One (1) member shall be a person who has been a user of hearing instruments for a period of at least five (5) years preceding that person's appointment to the council and who shall never have been engaged in the practice of hearing instrument dispensing and fitting, audiology or medicine.

In order that the terms may be appropriately staggered, initial appointments to the council are for the following terms: one (1) member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) shall be appointed to a term of one (1) year; one (1) member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; one (1) member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years; the member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(B) shall be appointed to a term of three (3) years; and the member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(C) shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, each member appointed to the council shall be appointed to a term of five (5) years. No person is eligible to serve successive terms on the council; provided, that those members appointed to a one- or two-year term under this subsection (b) are eligible to succeed themselves for one (1) successive five-year term. In the event of a vacancy on the council, the governor shall appoint a person qualified under the appropriate subdivision of this subsection (b) to fill the unexpired vacancy. The initial appointments to the council shall include the current and immediate past board chair of the licensing board of hearing aid dispensers. In making appointments to the council, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the council is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the council is a member of a racial minority.

Each member of the council shall receive fifty dollars ($50.00) per diem expenses when actually engaged in the discharge of such member's official duties and, in addition, shall be reimbursed for attending any meeting of the council within this state, in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Such council shall be administratively attached to the board of communications disorders and sciences and the division of health related boards.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 4; 2012, ch. 718, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The council for licensing hearing instrument specialists, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

63-17-203. Powers and duties of the council.

The powers and duties of the council are to:

Supervise and administer qualifying examinations to test the knowledge and proficiency of applicants for a license;

License persons who apply to the council and who are qualified to practice the fitting of hearing instruments;

Purchase and maintain or rent audiometric equipment and facilities necessary to carry out the examination of applicants for license;

Issue and renew licenses, under the name of the board;

Deny, suspend or revoke licenses pursuant to this part;

Appoint representatives to conduct or supervise the examination of applicants for license;

Designate the time and place for examining applicants for license;

Make and publish rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state that are necessary to carry out this part. All rules relating to hearing instrument specialists shall be initiated and adopted by a majority of the members of the council and then shall be approved by a majority of the members of the board;

Require an annual calibration of audiometric equipment;

Provide all examinations required by this part. The council may contract with organizations to conduct examinations;

Establish minimum requirements of test procedure and test equipment to be used in the fitting of hearing instruments and also the retention of records of all fittings;

Inspect the facilities or records, or both, of persons who practice the fitting and selling of hearing instruments, upon a showing of probable cause of a violation of this part;

Require lists, set standards and approve programs for trainees as provided in § 63-17-207;

Prescribe regulations requiring continuing education as a prerequisite for renewal of licenses to practice; and

Employ a consultant to assist the council in its duties.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 5; 2016, ch. 811, § 1.

63-17-204. Meetings.

The council shall meet at least once each year at a place and time determined by the chair. The council shall also meet at such other times and places as may be appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the council.

The presiding officer of the council shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 6; 2016, ch. 612, § 3.

63-17-205. License required.

No person shall engage in the sale of or practice of dispensing and fitting hearing instruments or display a sign or in any other way advertise or hold out to be a hearing instrument specialist unless direct hands-on testing and follow-up services are provided to persons to whom the hearing instrument specialist has dispensed and/or sold a hearing instrument, and such person holds a current, unsuspended, unrevoked license issued by the council as provided in this part.

The license required by this section shall be kept conspicuously posted in the specialist's principal office or place of business at all times.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 7.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-206. Construction — Application.

This part shall not be construed to prevent any person who is a physician licensed to practice by the board of medical examiners from treating or fitting hearing instruments to the human ear.

It is lawful for any person, who meets the requirements of §§ 63-17-205 and 63-17-207 and, who is listed as an apprentice licensee applicant with the council and who is under the direct supervision of a sponsoring licensed hearing instrument specialist to perform any of the services or acts included in the definition of hearing instrument dispensing and fitting as contained in this part; provided, that such person does so under the direct supervision of the licensed hearing instrument specialist and with the licensed dispenser making final selection and fitting to the client. No licensed dispenser shall supervise more than two (2) such apprentice licensee applicants or apprentice licensees combined at the same time.

This part shall not be construed to prevent any person who is an audiologist licensed by the board from practicing audiology as defined in § 63-17-103, nor to prevent any person who is a speech-language pathologist licensed by the board from practicing speech-language pathology as defined in § 63-17-103.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 8.

63-17-207. Preliminary application requirements — Fees.

An applicant for a license shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age; and

Have an education equivalent to two (2) years of accredited college level coursework or national board for certification in hearing instrument sciences (NBC-HIS) board certification.

Such applicant shall pay a nonrefundable application fee as set by the council no later than forty-five (45) days in advance of the next scheduled examination.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 9; 2019, ch. 323, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “or national board for certification in hearing instrument sciences (NBC-HIS) board certification” at the end of (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 323, § 2. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-208. Apprentice license.

Applicants who meet the requirements of § 63-17-207 with respect to age and education may apply for an apprentice license.

The apprentice licensee shall function under the direct supervision of the sponsoring licensed hearing instrument specialist for a period of at least three (3) months after submitting an application, and during such three-month period, the sponsoring licensed dispenser must make the final selection and fitting of the hearing instrument.

During the apprentice period, the apprentice licensee shall complete sixty (60) classroom hours of prescribed coursework.

The apprentice license will remain in effect no longer than one (1) year and cannot be renewed.

Applicants for an apprentice license shall pay the council a nonrefundable fee as set by the council.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 10; 2016, ch. 811, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-209. Examination.

Upon the payment of an examination fee as set by the council, an applicant for a license who is notified by the council that the applicant has fulfilled the requirements of § 63-17-207 shall appear at a time, place and before such persons as the council may designate to be examined by written and practical tests in order to demonstrate that such applicant is qualified to practice the fitting of hearing instruments.

The council shall give at least one (1) examination of the type prescribed in this section each year and such additional examinations as the volume of applications may make appropriate.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 11; 2016, ch. 811, § 5.

63-17-210. Examination requirements.

The examination provided in § 63-17-209 shall consist of:

Tests of knowledge in the following areas as they pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:

Basic physics of sound;

The human hearing mechanism, including the science of hearing and the causes and rehabilitation of abnormal hearing and hearing disorders; and

Structure and function of hearing instruments;

Tests of proficiency in the following techniques as they pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:

Pure tone audiometry, including air conduction testing and bone conduction testing;

Live voice or recorded voice speech audiometry, including speech reception threshold testing and speech discrimination testing;

Effective masking;

Recording and evaluation of audiograms and speech audiometry to determine hearing instrument candidacy;

Selection and adaption of hearing instruments and testing of hearing instruments;

Taking earmold impressions; and

Other skills as may be required for the fitting of hearing instruments; and

Tests of knowledge of the provisions and requirements of this part.

The tests under this section shall not include questions requiring a medical or surgical education.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 12.

63-17-211. Provisions for fees.

Upon payment of an initial license fee as determined by the council, the council shall issue a license to each applicant who passes the examination. Such initial license shall expire as provided by rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

During the second year of a biennial renewal period, the initial license fee shall be one-half (½) of the biennial renewal fee.

The council may, in its discretion, license as a hearing instrument specialist, without examination, on the payment of a fee as set by the council, an applicant who is a hearing instrument specialist, certified, registered or licensed under the laws of another state or country, if the applicant's qualifications for certification, registration or licensure meet the licensure requirements in force in this state upon the date of the specialist's application for certification, registration or licensure in this state.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 13.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-212. Notification of change of address.

Each licensee shall notify the council of any change of address of the licensee's place of business, within thirty (30) days of such change. Failure to give such notice shall be deemed just cause for disciplinary action by the council.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 14.

63-17-213. Registry of license holders — Review of qualifications.

The council shall issue, under the board's name, all licenses approved by the council, and the board and shall maintain a registry of all license holders. It is the duty of the council to review and approve the qualifications of applicants for certification or renewal as hearing instrument specialists.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 15.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-214. Renewal — Fees — Retirement.

Each licensed hearing instrument specialist shall pay to the council a biennial renewal fee as set by the council, payable in advance, for the ensuing two (2) years.

The council shall notify each licensee that such renewal is due.

As a condition of renewal, the licensee shall be reexamined by the council and shall pay a reexamination fee as set by the council or shall submit verification of compliance of continuing education requirements as may be set by the council. The reexamination shall consist of all of the areas required pursuant to § 63-17-210.

When any licensed hearing instrument specialist fails to pay the license fee within sixty (60) days after it becomes due, as provided in this section, the license of such person is automatically revoked at the expiration of the sixty (60) days after the renewal fee was required, without further notice or hearing.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in § 63-17-219 may make application in writing to the council for the reinstatement of such license; and, upon good cause being shown, the council, in its discretion, may reinstate such license upon payment of all past due renewal fees and upon further payment of a sum set by the council.

Any person licensed to practice by this part who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this part if such person files with this council an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the council, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the council deems necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the council as provided by this part and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the council.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the council determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest twenty-five cents (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (f).

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 16.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-17-215. Expenses of board and council paid by fees.

The fees relating to the practice of dispensing hearing instruments shall be set by the board in an amount sufficient to pay all of the expenses of the council, as well as all of the expenses of the board that are directly attributable to the performance of its duties pursuant to this part. Expenditures of the council for investigations and disciplinary actions shall be the financial responsibility of the licensees who are regulated by such council.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 17.

Cross-References. Disposition of fines and penalties, § 63-1-113.

Fund, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

63-17-216. Sale of hearing instruments.

Any person who engages in the practice of dispensing and fitting hearing instruments shall deliver to each person supplied with a hearing instrument, by the dispensing person's or at the dispensing person's order or direction, a bill of sale that contains each of the following:

The signature of the licensed hearing instrument specialist, the address of the specialist's regular place of business and the specialist's license number and license expiration date;

The make and model of the hearing instrument supplied, and the amount charged for the hearing instrument and whether the hearing instrument is new, used or rebuilt;

A clear statement of the terms of sale, including the provisions required by § 63-17-217; and

The name and address of the council and a statement that the council will receive complaints on any matter relating to the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments.

Any sale of a hearing instrument is subject to the same conditions and provisions as are prescribed by the United States food and drug administration and the federal trade commission.

Any hearing aid that is sold, fitted or dispensed to a consumer in this state shall be clearly and permanently marked with:

The name of the manufacturer or distributor or the model name or number;

The serial number; and

The year of manufacture.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 18; 2003, ch. 70, § 1.

63-17-217. Return of purchased hearing instruments.

Within thirty (30) days of the date of delivery, any purchaser of a hearing instrument from a licensee is entitled to return the hearing instrument for any reason; provided, that such instrument is returned in satisfactory condition and such purchaser pays only reasonable charges for the hearing instrument and related services. Such return privileges apply only to a first time purchaser of a hearing instrument.

Charges to be imposed upon return of a hearing instrument as provided in subsection (a) shall be clearly stated in the bill of sale.

This section shall not be construed to supersede any duly promulgated regulation issued by the federal trade commission.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 19.

63-17-218. Liability of sponsors.

Any person sponsoring an apprentice licensee and/or apprentice licensee applicant under this part shall be held responsible for the acts or omissions of the sponsor's apprentice licensee and/or apprentice licensee applicant within the course and scope of the licensee's or applicant's employment, during the apprenticeship, as well as the sponsor's employees.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 20.

63-17-219. Causes of denial, revocation or suspension — Costs of prosecution — Witnesses — Subpoenas.

Subject to the due process requirements of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any person registered under this part may have such license denied, revoked or suspended for a fixed period to be determined by the council for any of the following causes:

Conviction of an offense involving moral turpitude. The record of such conviction or certified copy thereof from the clerk of the court where such conviction occurred or by the judge of such court is sufficient evidence to warrant revocation or suspension;

Securing a license under this part through fraud or deceit;

Unethical conduct, gross and/or repeated acts of ignorance or inefficiency in the conduct of such person's practice;

Knowingly practicing while suffering with a contagious or infectious disease;

Use of a false name or alias in the practice of the profession; and

Violating any of this part.

The council shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the council to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the council may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The council shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the council or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the council, by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members to which the council is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the council shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the council for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the council votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the council is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the council regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the council is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides, and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the council and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered; and any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the council by order of the council shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the council in the same manner as all other expenses of the council are paid.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the board or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides; and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered, and any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 21; 1999, ch. 434, § 3; 1999, ch. 443, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1999, ch. 434, § 3 and ch. 443, § 3 each amended this section by adding provisions assigning identical powers to both the council for hearing instrument specialists and the board of communication disorders and sciences. The version in Acts 1999, ch. 434, § 3, assigning those powers to the council, was added as (b). The version in Acts 1999, ch. 443, § 3, assigning those powers to the board, was added as (c).

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of communications disorders and sciences and its council for hearing instrument specialists has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-17-220. Hearing before council required.

Except as otherwise provided by § 63-17-214, no license issued pursuant to this part may be suspended, revoked, denied or renewal denied without a hearing before the council or its duly authorized trial examiner, if requested by the certificate holder or applicant, on due notice.

Any action of the council taken pursuant to this part shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 22.

63-17-221. Penalties council may enforce by seeking court injunction.

A violation of this part is a Class B misdemeanor.

The council, with the approval of the board, may seek to enforce any provision of this part by petitioning a court of appropriate jurisdiction for an injunction to enjoin continuing violations of this part or by any other appropriate proceeding. No such proceeding is barred by any proceeding had or pending pursuant to § 63-17-214 or by the imposition of any fine or term of imprisonment pursuant thereto.

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 23.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-17-222. Licensed hearing aid dispenser eligible for hearing instrument specialist license.

Upon July 1, 1995, any person who is a trainee, apprentice or who has entered into a training program to become a licensed hearing aid dispenser shall be eligible to receive a license as a hearing instrument specialist; provided, that such person complies with all of the requirements of chapter 15 of this title [repealed], as it existed upon July 1, 1995.

Upon July 1, 1995, any person who is a licensed hearing aid dispenser shall be eligible to receive a license as a hearing instrument specialist. Any person who is a licensed hearing aid dispenser upon July 1, 1995, who wishes to obtain a license as a hearing instrument specialist shall submit a request to the council to receive the appropriate license as a hearing instrument specialist. No additional fee shall be imposed upon persons for the issuance of a license as a hearing instrument specialist pursuant to this subsection (b).

Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 1 repealed chapter 15 of this title, effective July 1, 1995. For new provisions concerning hearing instrument specialists, see this part.

63-17-123. [Reserved.]